The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Flag-raising, by Kate Douglas Wiggin

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net


Title: The Flag-raising

Author: Kate Douglas Wiggin

Posting Date: November 4, 2008 [EBook #2315]
Release Date: September, 2000

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE FLAG-RAISING ***




Produced by Susan L. Farley.  HTML version by Al Haines.










THE FLAG-RAISING


by

KATE DOUGLAS WIGGIN




CONTENTS

   I. A DIFFERENCE IN HEARTS
  II. REBECCA'S POINT OF VIEW
 III. WISDOM'S WAYS
  IV. THE SAVING OF THE COLORS
   V. THE STATE O' MAINE




I

A DIFFERENCE IN HEARTS

"I DON' know as I cal'lated to be the makin' of any child," Miranda had
said as she folded Aurelia's letter and laid it in the light-stand
drawer.  "I s'posed of course Aurelia would send us the one we asked
for, but it's just like her to palm off that wild young one on somebody
else."

"You remember we said that Rebecca, or even Jenny might come, in case
Hannah could n't," interposed Jane.

"I know we did, but we hadn't any notion it would turn out that way,"
grumbled Miranda.

"She was a mite of a thing when we saw her three years ago," ventured
Jane; "she's had time to improve."

"And time to grow worse!"

"Won't it be kind of a privilege to put her on the right track?" asked
Jane timidly.

"I don' know about the privilege part; it'll be considerable work, I
guess. If her mother hasn't got her on the right track by now, she
won't take to it herself all of a sudden."

This depressed and depressing frame of mind had lasted until the
eventful day dawned on which Rebecca was to arrive.

"If she makes as much work after she comes as she has before, we might
as well give up hope of ever gettin' any rest," sighed Miranda as she
hung the dish towels on the barberry bushes at the side door.

"But we should have had to clean house, Rebecca or no Rebecca," urged
Jane; "and I can't see why you've scrubbed and washed and baked as you
have for that one child, nor why you've about bought out Watson's stock
of dry goods."

"I know Aurelia if you don't," responded Miranda. "I've seen her house,
and I've seen that batch o' children, wearin' one another's clothes and
never carin' whether they had 'em on right side out or not; I know what
they've had to live and dress on, and so do you. That child will like
as not come here with a bundle o' things borrowed from the rest o' the
family. She'll have Hannah's shoes and John's undershirts and Mark's
socks most likely. I suppose she never had a thimble on her finger in
her life, but she'll know the feelin' o' one before she's been here
many days. I've bought a piece of unbleached muslin and a piece o'
brown gingham for her to make up; that'll keep her busy. Of course she
won't pick up anything after herself; she probably never saw a duster,
and she'll be as hard to train into our ways as if she was a heathen."

"She'll make a dif'rence," acknowledged Jane, "but she may turn out
more biddable than we think."

"She'll mind when she's spoken to, biddable or not," remarked Miranda
with a shake of the last towel.

Miranda Sawyer had a heart, of course, but she had never used it for
any other purpose than the pumping and circulating of blood. She was
just, conscientious, economical, industrious; a regular attendant at
church and Sunday-school, and a member of the State Missionary and
Bible societies, but in the presence of all these chilly virtues you
longed for one warm little fault, or lacking that, one likable failing,
something to make you sure that she was thoroughly alive. She had never
had any education other than that of the neighborhood district school,
for her desires and ambitions had all pointed to the management of the
house, the farm, and the dairy. Jane, on the other hand, had gone to an
academy, and also to a boarding-school for young ladies; so had
Aurelia; and after all the years that had elapsed there was still a
slight difference in language and in manner between the elder and the
two younger sisters.

Jane, too, had had the inestimable advantage of a sorrow; not the
natural grief at the loss of her aged father and mother, for she had
been resigned to let them go; but something far deeper. She was engaged
to marry young, Tom Carter, who had nothing to marry on, it is true,
but who was sure to have, some time or other. Then the war broke out.
Tom enlisted at the first call. Up to that time Jane had loved him with
a  quiet, friendly sort of affection, and had given her country a mild
emotion of the same sort. But the strife, the danger, the anxiety of
the time, set new currents of feeling in motion. Life became something
other than the three meals a day, the round of cooking, washing,
sewing, and churchgoing. Personal gossip vanished from the village
conversation. Big things took the place of trifling ones,--sacred
sorrows of wives and mothers, pangs of fathers and husbands,
self-denials, sympathies, new desire to bear one another's burdens. Men
and women grew fast in those days of the nation's trouble and danger,
and Jane awoke from the vague dull dream she had hitherto called life
to new hopes, new fears, new purposes. Then after a year's anxiety, a
year when one never looked in the newspaper without dread and sickness
of suspense, came the telegram saying that Tom was wounded; and without
so much as asking Miranda's leave, she packed her trunk and started for
the South. She was in time to hold Tom's hand through hours of pain; to
show him for once the heart of a prim New England girl when it is
ablaze with love and grief; to put her arms about him so that he could
have a home to die in, and that was all;--all, but it served.

It carried her through weary months of nursing--nursing of other
soldiers for Tom's dear sake; it sent her home a better woman; and
though she had never left Riverboro in all the years that lay between,
and had grown into the counterfeit presentment of her sister and of all
other thin, spare, New England spinsters, it was something of a
counterfeit, and underneath was still the faint echo of that wild
heartbeat of her girlhood. Having learned the trick of beating and
loving and suffering, the poor faithful heart persisted, although it
lived on memories and carried on its sentimental operations mostly in
secret.

"You're soft, Jane," said Miranda once; "you allers was soft, and you
allers will be. If't wa'n't for me keeping you stiffened up, I b'lieve
you'd leak out o' the house into the dooryard."

It was already past the appointed hour for Mr. Cobb and his coach to be
lumbering down the street.

"The stage ought to be here," said Miranda, glancing nervously at the
tall clock for the twentieth time. "I guess everything's done. I've
tacked up two thick towels back of her washstand and put a mat under
her slop-jar; but children are awful hard on furniture. I expect we
sha'n't know this house a year from now." Jane's frame of mind was
naturally depressed and timorous, having been affected by Miranda's
gloomy presages of evil to come. The only difference between the
sisters in this matter was that while Miranda only wondered how they
could endure Rebecca, Jane had flashes of inspiration in which she
wondered how Rebecca would endure them. It was in one of these flashes
that she ran up the back stairs to put a vase of apple blossoms and a
red tomato-pincushion on Rebecca's bureau.

The stage rumbled to the side door of the brick house, and Mr. Cobb
handed Rebecca out like a real lady passenger. She alighted with great
circumspection, put a bunch of flowers in her aunt Miranda's hand, and
received her salute; it could hardly be called a kiss without injuring
the fair name of that commodity. "You need n't 'a'bothered to bring
flowers," remarked that gracious and tactful lady; "the garden's always
full of 'em here when it comes time."

Jane then kissed Rebecca, giving a somewhat better imitation of the
real thing than her sister.

"Put the trunk in the entry, Jeremiah, and we'll get it carried
upstairs this afternoon," she said.

"I'll take it up for ye now, if ye say the word, girls."

"No, no; don't leave the horses; somebody'll be comin' past, and we can
call 'em in."

"Well, good-by, Rebecca; good-day, Mirandy 'n' Jane.  You've got a
lively little girl there. I guess she'll be a first-rate company
keeper."

Miss Sawyer shuddered openly at the adjective "lively" as applied to a
child; her belief being that though children might be seen, if
absolutely necessary, they certainly should never be heard if she could
help it. "We're not much used to noise, Jane and me," she remarked
acidly.

Mr. Cobb saw that he had spoken indiscreetly, but he was too unused to
argument to explain himself readily, so he drove away, trying to think
by what safer word than "lively" he might have described his
interesting little passenger.

"I'll take you up and show you your room, Rebecca," Miss Miranda said.
"Shut the mosquito nettin' door tight behind you, so's to keep the
flies out; it ain't fly time yet, but I want you to start right; take
your parcel along with you and then you won't have to come down for it;
always make your head save your heels. Rub your feet on that braided
rug; hang your hat and cape in the entry as you go past."

"It's my best hat," said Rebecca.

"Take it upstairs then and put it in the clothes-press; but I shouldn't
'a' thought you'd 'a' worn your best hat on the stage."

"It's my only hat," explained Rebecca. "My every-day hat was n't good
enough to bring. Sister Fanny's going to finish it."

"Lay your parasol in the entry closet."

"Do you mind if I keep it in my room, please? It always seems safer."

"There ain't any thieves hereabouts, and if there was, I guess they
wouldn't make for your sunshade; but come along. Remember to always go
up the back way; we don't use the front stairs on account o' the
carpet; take care o' the turn and don't ketch your foot; look to your
right and go in. When you've washed your face and hands and brushed
your hair you can come down, and by and by we'll unpack your trunk and
get you settled before supper. Ain't you got your dress on hind side
foremost?"

Rebecca drew her chin down and looked at the row of smoked pearl
buttons running up and down the middle of her flat little chest. "Hind
side foremost?  Oh, I see! No, that's all right. If you have seven
children you can't keep buttonin' and unbuttonin' 'em all the
time--they have to do themselves. We're always buttoned up in front at
our house. Mira's only three, but she's buttoned up in front, too."

Miranda said nothing as she closed the door, but her looks were more
eloquent than words.

Rebecca stood perfectly still in the centre of the floor and looked
about her. There was a square of oilcloth in front of each article of
furniture and a drawn-in rug beside the single four poster, which was
covered with a fringed white dimity counterpane.

Everything was as neat as wax, but the ceilings were much higher than
Rebecca was accustomed to. It was a north room, and the window, which
was long and narrow, looked out on the back buildings and the barn.

It was not the room, which was far more comfortable than Rebecca's own
at Sunnybrook Farm, nor the lack of view, nor yet the long journey, for
she was not conscious of weariness; it was not the fear of a strange
place, for she adored new places and new sensations; it was because of
some curious blending of uncomprehended emotions that Rebecca stood her
beloved pink sunshade in the corner, tore off her best hat, flung it on
the bureau with the porcupine quills on the under side, and stripping
down the dimity spread, precipitated herself into the middle of the bed
and pulled the counterpane over her head.

In a moment the door opened with a clatter of the latch.

Knocking was a refinement quite unknown in Riverboro, and if it had
been heard of, it would never have been wasted on a child. Miss Miranda
entered, and as her eye wandered about the vacant room, it fell upon a
white and tempestuous ocean of counterpane, an ocean breaking into
strange movements of wave and crest and billow.

"Rebecca!"

The tone in which the word was voiced gave it all the effect of having
been shouted from the housetops.

A dark ruffled head and two frightened eyes appeared above the dimity
spread.

"What are you layin' on your good bed in the daytime for, messin' up
the feathers, and dirtyin' the comforter with your dusty boots?"

Rebecca rose guiltily. There seemed no excuse to make. Her offense was
beyond explanation or apology.

"I'm sorry, Aunt Mirandy-something came over me; I don't know what."

"Well, if it comes over you very soon again we'll have to find out what
't is. Spread your bed up smooth this minute, for 'Bijah Flagg's
bringin' your trunk upstairs, and I wouldn't let him see such a
cluttered-up room for anything; he'd tell it all over town."

When Mr. Cobb had put up his horses that night he carried a kitchen
chair to the side of his wife, who was sitting on the back porch.

"I brought a little Randall girl down on the stage from Maplewood
to-day, mother. She's related to the Sawyer girls an' is goin' to live
with 'em," he said, as he sat down and began to whittle. "She's
Aurelia's child, the sister that ran away with Susan Randall's son just
before we come here to live."

"How old a child?"

"Bout ten, or somewhere along there, an' small for her age; but land!
she might be a hundred to hear her talk! She kept me jumpin' tryin' to
answer her! Of all the queer children I ever come across she's the
queerest. She ain't no beauty--her face is all eyes; but if she ever
grows up to them eyes an' fills out a little she'll make folks stare.
Land, mother! I wish 't you could 'a' heard her talk."

"I don't see what she had to talk about, a child like that, to a
stranger," replied Mrs. Cobb.

"Stranger or no stranger, 't would n't make no difference to her. She'd
talk to a pump or a grindstone; she'd talk to herself ruther 'n keep
still."

"What did she talk about?

"Blamed if I can repeat any of it. She kept me so surprised I didn't
have my wits about me. She had a little pink sunshade--it kind o'
looked like a doll's umberella, 'n' she clung to it like a burr to a
woolen stockin'. I advised her to open it up--the sun was so hot; but
she said no, 't would fade, an' she tucked it under her dress.  'It's
the dearest thing in life to me,' says she, 'but it's a dreadful care.'
Them's the very words, an' it's all the words I remember.  'It's the
dearest thing in life to me, but it's an awful care!'"--here Mr. Cobb
laughed aloud as he tipped his chair back against the side of the
house. "There was another thing, but I can't get it right exactly. She
was talkin' 'bout the circus parade an' the snake charmer in a gold
chariot, an' says she, 'She was so beautiful beyond compare, Mr. Cobb,
that it made you have lumps in your throat to look at her.' She'll be
comin' over to see you, mother, an' you can size her up for yourself, I
don' know how she'll git on with Mirandy Sawyer--poor little soul!"

This doubt was more or less openly expressed in Riverboro, which,
however, had two opinions on the subject; one that it was a most
generous thing in the Sawyer girls to take one of Aurelia's children to
educate, the other that the education would be bought at a price wholly
out of proportion to its real value.

Rebecca's first letters to her mother would seem to indicate that she
cordially coincided with the latter view of the situation.



II

REBECCA'S POINT OF VIEW

DEAR MOTHER,--I am safely here. My dress was not much tumbled and Aunt
Jane helped me press it out. I like Mr. Cobb very much. He chews
tobacco but throws newspapers straight up to the doors of the houses. I
rode outside with him a little while, but got inside before I got to
Aunt Miranda's house. I did not want to, but thought you would like it
better. Miranda is such a long word that I think I will say Aunt M. and
Aunt J. in my Sunday letters. Aunt J. has given me a dictionary to look
up all the hard words in. It takes a good deal of time and I am glad
people can talk without stoping to spell. It is much eesier to talk
than write and much more fun. The brick house looks just the same as
you have told us. The parler is splendid and gives YOU creeps and
chills when you look in the door. The furnature is ellergant too, and
all the rooms but there are no good sitting-down places exsept in the
kitchen. The same cat is here but they never save the kittens and the
cat is too old to play with. Hannah told me once you ran away to be
married to father and I can see it would be nice. If Aunt M. would run
away I think I should like to live with Aunt J. She does not hate me as
bad as Aunt M. does.  Tell Mark he can have my paint box, but I should
like him to keep the red cake in case I come home again. I hope Hannah
and John do mot get tired doing my work.

Your afectionate friend

REBECCA.

P. S. Please give the piece of poetry to John because he likes my
poetry even when it is not very good. This piece is not very good but
it is true but I hope you won't mind what is in it as you ran away.

  This house is dark and dull and dreer
  No light doth shine from far or near
  Its like the tomb.

  And those of us who live herein
  Are almost as dead as serrafim
  Though not as good.

  My guardian angel is asleep
  At leest he doth not virgil keep
  Ah! Woe is me!

  Then give me back my lonely farm
  Where none alive did wish me harm
  Dear home of youth!

P.S. again. I made the poetry like a piece in a book but could not get
it right at first. You see "tomb" and "good" do not sound well together
but I wanted to say "tomb" dreadfully and as serrafim are always good I
could n't take that out. I have made it over now. It does not say my
thoughts as well but think it is more right. Give the best one to John
as he keeps them in a box with his bird's eggs. This is the best one.

SUNDAY THOUGHTS

BY

REBECCA ROWENA RANDALL

  This house is dark and dull and drear
  No light doth shine from far or near
  Nor ever could.

  And those of us who live herein
  Are most as dead as seraphim
  Though not as good.

  My guardian angel is asleep
  At least he doth no vigil keep
  But far doth roam.

  Then give me back my lonely farm
  Where none alive did wish me harm,
  Dear childhood home!

DEAR MOTHER,--I am thrilling with unhappyness this morning. I got that
out of a book called Cora The Doctor's Wife. Cora's husband's mother
was very cross and unfeeling to her like Aunt M. to me. I wish Hannah
had come instead of me for it was Hannah that Aunt M. wanted and she is
better than I am and does not answer back so quick. Are there any
peaces of my buff calico. Aunt J. wants enough to make a new waste,
button behind, so I wont look so outlandish. The stiles are quite
pretty in Riverboro and those at Meeting quite ellergant, more so than
in Temperance.

  This town is stilish, gay and fair,
  And full of wellthy riches rare,
  But I would pillow on my arm
  The thought of my sweet Brookside Farm.

School is pretty good. The Teacher can answer more questions than the
Temperance one but not so many as I can ask. I am smarter than all the
girls but one but not so smart as two boys. Emma Jane can add and
subtract in her head like a streek of lightning and knows the speling
book right through but has no thoughts of any kind. She is in the Third
Reader but does not like stories in books. I am in the Sixth Reader but
just because I cannot say the seven multiplication Table Miss Dearborn
threttens to put me in the baby primer class with Elijah and Elisha
Simpson little twins.

  Sore is my heart and bent my stubborn pride,
  With Lijah and with Lisha am I tied,
  My soul recoyles like Cora Doctor's Wife,
  Like her I feer I cannot bare this life.

I am going to try for the speling prize but fear I cannot get it. I
would not care but wrong speling looks dreadful in poetry. Last Sunday
when I found seraphim in the dictionary I was ashamed I had made it
serrafim but seraphim is not a word you can guess at like another long
one, outlandish, in this letter which spells itself. Miss Dearborn says
use the words you can spell and if you cant spell seraphim make angel
do but angels are not just the same as seraphims.  Seraphims are
brighter whiter and have bigger wings and I think are older and longer
dead than angels which are just freshly dead and after a long time in
heaven around the great white throne grow to be seraphims.

I sew on brown gingham dresses every afternoon when Emma Jane and the
Simpsons are playing house or running on the Logs when their mothers do
not know it. Their mothers are afraid they will drown and aunt M. is
afraid I will wet my clothes so will not let me either. I can play from
half past four to supper and after supper a little bit and Saturday
afternoons. I am glad our cow has a calf and it is spotted. It is going
to be a good year for apples and hay so you and John will be glad and
we can pay a little more morgage. Miss Dearborn asked us what is the
object of edducation and I said the object of mine was to help pay off
the morgage. She told Aunt M. and I had to sew extra for punishment
because she says a morgage is disgrace like stealing or smallpox and it
will be all over town that we have one on our farm. Emma Jane is not
morgaged nor Richard Carter nor Dr. Winship but the Simpsons are.

  Rise my soul, strain every nerve,
  Thy morgage to remove,
  Gain thy mother's heartfelt thanks
  Thy family's grateful love.

Pronounce family quick or it won't sound right.

Your loving little friend
  REBECCA.


DEAR JOHN,--YOU remember when we tide the new dog in the barn how he
bit the rope and howled. I am just like him only the brick house is the
barn and I can not bite Aunt M. because I must be grateful and
edducation is going to be the making of me and help you pay off the
mortgage when we grow up.

Your loving
  BECKY.



III.

WISDOM'S WAYS

THE day of Rebecca's arrival had been Friday, and on the Monday
following she began her education at the school which was in Riverboro
Centre, about a mile distant. Miss Sawyer borrowed a neighbor's horse
and wagon and drove her to the schoolhouse, interviewing the teacher,
Miss Dearborn, arranging for books, and generally starting the child on
the path that was to lead to boundless knowledge.

Rebecca walked to school after the first morning. She loved this part
of the day's programme. When the dew was not too heavy and the weather
was fair there was a short cut through the woods. She turned off the
main road, crept through Joshua Woodman's bars, waved away Mrs.
Carter's cows, trod the short grass of the pasture, with its well-worn
path running through gardens of buttercups and whiteweed, and groves of
boxberry leaves and sweet fern. She descended a little hill, jumped
from stone to stone across a woodland brook, startling the drowsy
frogs, who were always winking and blinking in the morning sun. Then
came the "woodsy bit," with her feet pressing the slippery carpet of
brown pine needles; the woodsy bit so full of dewy morning
surprises,--fungous growths of brilliant orange and crimson springing
up around the stumps of dead trees, beautiful things born in a single
night; and now and then the miracle of a little clump of waxen Indian
pipes, seen just quickly enough to be saved from her careless tread.
Then she climbed a stile, went through a grassy meadow, slid under
another pair of bars, and came out into the road again, having gained
nearly half a mile.

How delicious it all was! Rebecca clasped her Quackenbos's Grammar and
Greenleaf's Arithmetic with a joyful sense of knowing her lessons. Her
dinner pail swung from her right hand, and she had a blissful
consciousness of the two soda biscuits spread with butter and syrup,
the baked cup-custard, the doughnut, and the square of hard
gingerbread. Sometimes she said whatever "piece" she was going to speak
on the next Friday afternoon.

"A soldier of the Legion lay dying in Algiers, There was lack of
woman's nursing, there was dearth of woman's tears."

How she loved the swing and the sentiment of it! How her young voice
quivered whenever she came to the refrain:--

"But we'll meet no more at Bingen, dear Bingen on the Rhine."

It always sounded beautiful in her ears, as she sent her tearful little
treble into the clear morning air.

Another early favorite (for we must remember that Rebecca's only
knowledge of the great world of poetry consisted of the selections in
vogue in the old school Readers) was:--

  "Woodman, spare that tree!
  Touch not a single bough!
  In youth it sheltered me,
  And I'll protect it now."

When Emma Jane Perkins walked through the "short cut" with her, the two
children used to render this with appropriate dramatic action. Emma
Jane always chose to be the woodman because she had nothing to do but
raise on high an imaginary axe. On the one occasion when she essayed
the part of the tree's romantic protector, she represented herself as
feeling "so awful foolish" that she refused to undertake it again, much
to the secret delight of Rebecca, who found the woodman's role much too
tame for her vaulting ambition. She reveled in the impassioned appeal
of the poet, and implored the ruthless woodman to be as brutal as
possible with the axe, so that she might properly put greater spirit
into her lines. One morning, feeling more frisky than usual, she fell
upon her knees and wept in the woodman's petticoat. Curiously enough,
her sense of proportion rejected this as soon as it was done.

"That wasn't right, it was silly, Emma Jane; but I'll tell you where it
might come in--in 'Give me Three Grains of Corn.' You be the mother,
and I'll be the famishing Irish child. For pity's sake put the axe
down; you are not the woodman any longer!"

"What'll I do with my hands, then?" asked Emma Jane.

"Whatever you like," Rebecca answered wearily; "you're just a
mother--that's all. What does your mother do with her hands? Nowhere
goes!

  "'Give me three grains of corn, mother,
  Only three grains of corn,
  It will keep the little life I have
  Till the coming of the morn.'"

This sort of thing made Emma Jane nervous and fidgety, but she was
Rebecca's slave and obeyed her lightest commands. At the last pair of
bars the two girls were sometimes met by a detachment of the Simpson
children, who lived in a black house with a red door and a red barn
behind, on the Blueberry Plains road. Rebecca felt an interest in the
Simpsons from the first, because there were so many of them and they
were so patched and darned, just like her own brood at the home farm.

The little schoolhouse with its flagpole on top and its two doors in
front, one for boys and the other for girls, stood on the crest of a
hill, with rolling fields and meadows on one side, a stretch of pine
woods on the other, and the river glinting and sparkling in the
distance. It boasted no attractions within. All was as bare and ugly
and uncomfortable as it well could be, for the villages along the river
expended so much money in repairing and rebuilding bridges that they
were obliged to be very economical in school privileges. The teacher's
desk and chair stood on a platform in one corner; there was an uncouth
stove, never blackened oftener than once a year, a map of the United
States, two blackboards, a ten-quart tin pail of water and long-handled
dipper on a corner shelf, and wooden desks and benches for the
scholars, who only numbered twenty in Rebecca's time. The seats were
higher in the back of the room, and the more advanced and longer-legged
pupils sat there, the position being greatly to be envied, as they were
at once nearer to the windows and farther from the teacher.

There were classes of a sort, although nobody, broadly speaking,
studied the same book with anybody else, or had arrived at the same
degree of proficiency in any one branch of learning. Rebecca in
particular was so difficult to classify that Miss Dearborn at the end
of a fortnight gave up the attempt altogether. She read with Dick
Carter and Living Perkins, who were fitting for the academy; recited
arithmetic with lisping little "Thuthan Thimpthon;" geography with Emma
Jane Perkins, and grammar after school hours to Miss Dearborn alone.
Full to the brim as she was of clever thoughts and quaint fancies, she
made at first but a poor hand at composition. The labor of writing and
spelling, with the added difficulties of punctuation and capitals,
interfered sadly with the free expression of ideas. She took history
with Alice Robinson's class, which was attacking the subject of the
Revolution, while Rebecca was bidden to begin with the discovery of
America. In a week she had mastered the course of events up to the
Revolution, and in ten days had arrived at Yorktown, where the class
had apparently established summer quarters. Then finding that extra
effort would only result in her reciting with the oldest Simpson boy,
she deliberately held herself back, for wisdom's ways were not those of
pleasantness nor her paths those of peace if one were compelled to
tread them in the company of Seesaw Simpson. Samuel Simpson was
generally called Seesaw, because of his difficulty in making up his
mind. Whether it were a question of fact, of spelling, or of date, of
going swimming or fishing, of choosing a book in the Sunday-school
library or a stick of candy at the village store, he had no sooner
determined on one plan of action than his wish fondly reverted to the
opposite one. Seesaw was pale, flaxen haired, blue eyed, round
shouldered, and given to stammering when nervous. Perhaps because of
his very weakness, Rebecca's decision of character had a fascination
for him, and although she snubbed him to the verge of madness, he could
never keep his eyes away from her. The force with which she tied her
shoe when the lacing came undone, the flirt over shoulder she gave her
black braid when she was excited or warm, her manner of studying,--book
on desk, arms folded, eyes fixed on the opposite wall,--all had an
abiding charm for Seesaw Simpson. When, having obtained permission, she
walked to the water pail in the corner and drank from the dipper,
unseen forces dragged Seesaw from his seat to go and drink after her.
It was not only that there was something akin to association and
intimacy in drinking next, but there was the fearful joy of meeting her
in transit and receiving a cold and disdainful look from her wonderful
eyes.

On a certain warm day in summer Rebecca's thirst exceeded the bounds of
propriety. When she asked a third time for permission to quench it at
the common fountain Miss Dearborn nodded "yes," but lifted her eyebrows
unpleasantly as Rebecca neared the desk. As she replaced the dipper
Seesaw promptly raised his hand, and Miss Dearborn indicated a weary
affirmative.

"What is the matter with you, Rebecca?" she asked.

"It is a very thirsty morning," answered Rebecca.

There seemed nothing humorous about this reply, which was merely the
statement of a fact, but an irrepressible titter ran through the
school.  Miss Dearborn did not enjoy jokes neither made nor understood
by herself, and her face flushed.

"I think you had better stand by the pail for five minutes, Rebecca; it
may help you to control your thirst."

Rebecca's heart fluttered. She to stand in the corner by the water pail
and be stared at by all the scholars! She unconsciously made a gesture
of angry dissent and moved a step nearer her seat, but was arrested by
Miss Dearborn's command in a still firmer voice.

"Stand by the pail, Rebecca!--Samuel Simpson how many times have you
asked for water already?"

"This is the f-f-fourth."

"Don't touch the dipper, please. The school has done nothing but drink
all day; it has had no time whatever to study. What is the matter with
you, Samuel?"

"It is a v-very thirsty m-morning," remarked Samuel, looking at Rebecca
while the school tittered.

"I judged so. Stand by the other side of the pail, with Rebecca."
Rebecca's head was bowed with shame and wrath. Life looked too black a
thing to be endured. The punishment was bad enough, but to be coupled
in correction with Seesaw Simpson was beyond human endurance.

Singing was the last exercise in the afternoon, and Minnie Smellie
chose "Shall we Gather at the River?" It was a curious choice and
seemed to hold some secret association with the situation and general
progress of events; or at any rate there was apparently some obscure
reason for the energy and vim with which the scholars looked at the
empty water pail as they shouted the choral invitation again and
again:--

  "Shall we gather at the river,
  The beautiful, the beautiful river?"

Miss Dearborn stole a look at Rebecca's bent head, and was frightened.
The child's face was pale save for two red spots glowing on her checks.
Tears hung on her lashes; her breath came and went quickly, and the
hand that held her pocket handkerchief trembled like a leaf.

"You may go to your seat, Rebecca," said Miss Dearborn at the end of
the first song. "Samuel, stay where you are till the close of school.
And let me tell you, scholars, that I asked Rebecca to stand by the
pail only to break up this habit of incessant drinking, which is
nothing but empty-mindedness and desire to walk to and fro over the
floor. Every time Rebecca has asked for a drink to-day the whole school
has gone to the pail like a regiment. She is really thirsty, and I dare
say I ought to have punished you for following her example, not her for
setting it. What shall we sing now, Alice?"

"'The Old Oaken Bucket,' please."

"Think of something dry, Alice, and change the subject. Yes, 'The Star
Spangled Banner' if you like, or anything else." Rebecca sank into her
seat and pulled the singing book from her desk. Miss Dearborn's public
explanation had shifted some of the weight from her heart, and she felt
a trifle raised in her self-esteem.

Under cover of the general relaxation of singing, offerings of
respectful sympathy began to make their appearance at her shrine.
Living Perkins, who could not sing, dropped a piece of maple sugar in
her lap as he passed her on his way to the blackboard to draw the map
of Maine, while Alice Robinson rolled a perfectly new slate pencil over
the floor with her foot until it reached Rebecca's place.

Altogether existence grew brighter, and when she was left alone with
the teacher for her grammar lesson she had nearly recovered her
equanimity, which was more than Miss Dearborn had. The last clattering
foot had echoed through the hall, Seesaw's backward glance of penitence
had been met and answered defiantly by one of cold disdain.

"Rebecca, I am afraid I punished you more than I meant," said Miss
Dearborn, who was only eighteen herself, and in her year of teaching
country schools had never encountered a child like Rebecca.

"I had n't missed a question this whole day, nor whispered either,"
quavered the culprit; "and I don't think I ought to be shamed just for
drinking."

"You started all the others, or it seemed as if you did. Whatever you
do they all do, whether you laugh, or write notes, or ask to leave the
room, or drink; and it must be stopped."

"Sam Simpson is a copycoat!" stormed Rebecca. "I would n't have minded
standing in the corner alone--that is, not so very much; but I couldn't
bear standing with him."

"I saw that you could n't, and that's the reason I told you to take
your seat, and left him in the corner. Remember that you are a stranger
in the place, and they take more notice of what you do, so you must be
careful. Now let's have our conjugations. Give me the verb 'to be,'
potential mood, past perfect tense."

  "I might have been
  Thou mightst have been
  He might have been
  We might  have been
  You might have been
  They might have been"

"Give me an example, please."

  "I might have been glad
  Thou mightst have been glad
  He, she, or it might have been glad"

"'He' or 'she' might have been glad because they are masculine and
feminine, but could 'it' have been glad?" asked Miss Dearborn, who was
very fond of splitting hairs.

"Why not?" asked Rebecca.

"Because 'it' is neuter gender."

"Could n't we say, 'The kitten might have been glad if it had known it
was not going to be drowned'?"

"Ye-es," Miss Dearborn answered hesitatingly, never very sure of
herself under Rebecca's fire; "but though we often speak of a baby, a
chicken, or a kitten as 'it,' they are really masculine or feminine
gender, not neuter."

Rebecca reflected a long moment and then asked, "Is a hollyhock neuter?"

"Oh yes, of course it is, Rebecca."

"Well, could n't we say, 'The hollyhock might have been glad to see it
rain, but there was a weak little baby bud growing out of its stalk and
it was afraid it might be hurt by the storm; so the big hollyhock was
kind of afraid, instead of being real glad'?"

Miss Dearborn looked puzzled as she answered, "Of course, Rebecca,
hollyhocks could not be sorry, or glad, or afraid, really."

"We can't tell, I s'pose," replied the child; "but I think they are,
anyway. Now what shall I say?"

"The subjunctive mood, past perfect tense of the verb 'to know.'"

  "If I had known
  If thou hadst known
  If he had known
  If we had known
  If you had known
  If they had known"

"Oh, it is the saddest tense," sighed Rebecca with a little a little
break in her voice; "nothing but ifs, ifs, ifs! And it makes you feel
that if they only had known, things might have been better!"

Miss Dearborn had not thought of it before, but on reflection she
believed the subjective mood was a "sad" one and "if" rather a sorry
"part of speech."

"Give me some examples of the subjective, Rebecca, and that will do for
this afternoon," she said.

"If I had not eaten salt mackerel for breakfast I should not have been
thirsty," said Rebecca with an April smile, as she closed her grammar.
"If thou hadst love me truly thou wouldst not have stood me up in the
corner. If Samuel had not loved wickedness he would not have followed
me to the water pail."

"And if Rebecca had loved the rules of the school she would have
controlled her thirst," finished Miss Dearborn with a kiss, and the two
parted friends.



IV

THE SAVING OF THE COLORS

EVEN when Rebecca had left school, having attained the great age of
seventeen and therefore able to look back over a past incredibly long
and full, she still reckoned time not by years, but by certain
important occurrences. Between these epoch-making events certain other
happenings stood out in bold relief against the gray of dull daily
life. There was the coming of the new minister, for though many were
tried only one was chosen; and finally there was the flag-raising, a
festivity that thrilled Riverboro and Edgewood society from centre to
circumference, a festivity that took place just before she entered the
Female Seminary at Wareham and said good-by to kind Miss Dearborn and
the village school.

There must have been other flag-raisings in history,--even the persons
most interested in this particular one would grudgingly have allowed
that much,--but it would have seemed to them improbable that any such
flag-raising, as theirs could twice glorify the same century. Of some
pageants it is tacitly admitted that there can be no duplicates, and
the flag-raising at Riverboro Centre was one of these; so that it is
small wonder if Rebecca chose it as one of the important dates in her
personal almanac. Mrs. Baxter, the new minister's wife, was the being,
under Providence, who had conceived the first idea of the flag. Mrs.
Baxter communicated her patriotic idea of a new flag to the Dorcas
Society, proposing that the women should cut and make it themselves.

"It may not be quite as good as those manufactured in the large
cities," she said, "but we shall be proud to see our home-made flag
flying in the breeze, and it will mean all the more to the young voters
growing up, to remember that their mothers made it with their own
hands."

"How would it do to let some of the girls help?" modestly asked Miss
Dearborn, the Riverboro teacher. "We might chose the best sewers and
let them put in at least a few stitches, so that they can feel they
have a share in it."

"Just the thing!" exclaimed Mrs. Baxter. "We can cut the stripes and
sew them together, and after we have basted on the white stars the
girls can apply them to the blue ground. We must have it ready for the
campaign rally, and we could n't christen it at a better time than in
this presidential year."

In this way the great enterprise was started, and day by day the
preparations went forward in the two villages.

The boys, as future voters and soldiers, demanded an active share in
the proceedings, and were organized by Squire Bean into a fife and drum
corps, so that by day and night martial but most inharmonious music
woke the echoes, and deafened mothers felt their patriotism oozing out
at the soles of their shoes. Dick Carter was made captain, for his
grandfather had a gold medal given him by Queen Victoria for rescuing
three hundred and twenty-six passengers from a sinking British vessel.
Riverboro thought it high time to pay some graceful tribute to Great
Britain in return for her handsome, conduct to Captain Nahum Carter,
and human imagination could contrive nothing more impressive than a
vicarious share in the flag-raising.

Miss Dearborn was to be Columbia and the older girls of the two schools
were to be the States. Such trade in muslins and red, white, and blue
ribbons had never been known since "Watson kep' store," and the number
of brief white petticoats hanging out to bleach would leave caused the
passing stranger to imagine Riverboro a continual dancing-school.

Juvenile virtue, both male and female, reached an almost impossible
height, for parents had only to lift a finger and say, "You shan't go
to the flag-raising!" and the refractory spirit at once armed itself
for new struggles toward the perfect life. Mr. Jeremiah Cobb had
consented to impersonate Uncle Sam, and was to drive Columbia and the
States to the "raising" on the top of his own stage. Meantime the boys
were drilling, the ladies were cutting and basting and stitching, and
the girls were sewing on stars; for the starry part of the spangled
banner was to remain with each of them in turn until she had performed
her share of the work.

It was felt by one and all a fine and splendid service indeed to help
in the making of the flag, and if Rebecca was proud to be of the chosen
ones, so was her Aunt Jane Sawyer, who had taught her all her delicate
stitches.

On a long-looked-for afternoon in August the minister's wife drove up
to the brick-house door, and handed out the great piece of bunting to
Rebecca, who received it in her arms with as much solemnity as if it
had been a child awaiting baptismal rites.

"I'm so glad!" she sighed happily. "I thought it would never come my
turn!"

"You should have had it a week ago, but Huldah Meserve upset the ink
bottle over her star, and we had to baste on another one. You are the
last, though, and then we shall sew the stars and stripes together, and
Seth Strout will get the top ready for hanging. Just think, it won't be
many days before you children will be pulling the rope with all your
strength, the band will be playing, the men will be cheering, and the
new flag will go higher and higher, till the red, white, and blue shows
against the sky!"

Rebecca's eyes fairly blazed. "Shall I 'hem on' my star, or buttonhole
it?" she asked.

"Look at all the others and make the most beautiful stitches you can,
that's all. It is your star, you know, and you can even imagine it is
your state, and try and have it the best of all. If everybody else is
trying to do the same thing with her state, that will make a great
country, won't it?"

Rebecca's eyes spoke glad confirmation of the idea. "My star, my
state!" she repeated joyously. "Oh, Mrs. Baxter, I'll make such fine
stitches you'll, think the white grew out of the blue!"

The new minister's wife looked pleased to see her spark kindle a flame
in the young heart. "You can sew so much of yourself into your star,"
she went on in the glad voice that made her so winsome, "that when you
are an old lady you can put on your specs and find it among all the
others. Good-by! Come up to the parsonage Saturday afternoon; Mr.
Baxter wants to see you."

"Judson, help that dear little genius of a Rebecca all you can!" she
said that night. "I don't know what she may, or may not, come to, some
day; I only wish she were ours! If you could have seen her clasp the
flag tight in her arms and put her cheek against it, and watched the
tears of feeling start in her eyes when I told her that her star was
her state! I kept whispering to myself, "'Covet not thy neighbor's
child!

Daily at four o'clock Rebecca scrubbed her hands almost to the bone,
brushed her hair, and otherwise prepared herself in body, mind, and
spirit for the consecrated labor of sewing on her star. All the time
that her needle cautiously, conscientiously formed the tiny stitches
she was making rhymes "in her head," her favorite achievement being
this:--

  "Your star, my star, all our stars together,
  They make the dear old banner proud
  To float in the bright fall weather."

There was much discussion as to which of the girls should impersonate
the State of Maine, for that was felt to be the highest honor in the
gift of the committee.

Alice Robinson was the prettiest child in the village, but she was very
shy and by no means a general favorite.

Minnie Smellie possessed the handsomest dress and a pair of white
slippers and open-work stockings that nearly carried the day, but she
was not at all the person to select for the central figure on the
platform.

Huldah Meserve was next voted upon, and the fact that if she were not
chosen her father might withdraw his subscription to the brass band
fund was a matter for grave consideration.

"I kind of hate to have such a giggler for the State of Maine; let
Huldah be the Goddess of Liberty," proposed Mrs. Burbank, whose
patriotism was more local than national.

"How would Rebecca Randall do for Maine, and let her speak some of her
verses?" suggested the new minister's wife, who, could she have had her
way, would have given all the prominent parts to Rebecca, from Uncle
Sam down.

So, beauty, fashion, and wealth having been tried and found wanting,
the committee discussed the claims of talent, and it transpired that to
the awestricken Rebecca fell the chief plum in the pudding. It was a
tribute to her gifts that there was no jealousy or envy among the other
girls; they readily conceded her special fitness for the role.

Her life had not been pressed down full to the brim of pleasures, and
she had a sort of distrust of joy in the bud.  Not until she saw it in
full radiance of bloom did she dare embrace it. She had never read any
verse but Byron, Felicia Hemans, bits of "Paradise Lost," and the
selections in the school readers, but she would have agreed heartily
with the poet who said:--

  "Not by appointment do we meet delight
  And joy; they heed not our expectancy;
  But round some corner in the streets of life
  They on a sudden clasp us with a smile."

For many nights before the raising, when she went to her bed, she said
to herself after she had finished her prayers: "It can't be true that
I'm chosen for the State of Maine! It just can't be true! Nobody could
be good enough, but oh, I'll try to be as good as I can! To be going to
Wareham Seminary next week and to be the State of Maine too! Oh! I must
pray hard to God to keep me meek and humble!"

The flag was to be raised on a Tuesday, and on the previous Sunday it
became known to the children that Clara Belle Simpson was coming back
from Acreville, coming to live with Mrs. Fogg and take care of the
baby. Clara Belle was one of Miss Dearborn's original flock, and if she
were left wholly out of the festivities she would be the only girl of
suitable age to be thus slighted; it seemed clear to the juvenile mind,
therefore, that neither she nor her descendants would ever recover from
such a blow. But, under all the circumstances, would she be allowed to
join in the procession? Even Rebecca, the optimistic, feared not, and
the committee confirmed her fears by saying that Abner Simpson's
daughter certainly could not take any prominent part in the ceremony,
but that they hoped Mrs. Fogg would allow her to witness it.

When Abner Simpson, urged by the town authorities, took his wife and
seven children away from Riverboro to Acreville, just over the border
in the next county, Riverboro went to bed leaving its barn and shed
doors unfastened, and drew long breaths of gratitude to Providence.

Of most winning disposition and genial manners, Mr. Simpson had not
that instinctive comprehension of property rights which renders a man a
valuable citizen.

Abner was a most unusual thief, and conducted his operations with a
tact and neighborly consideration none too common in the profession. He
would never steal a man's scythe in haying-time, nor his fur lap-robe
in the coldest of the winter. The picking of a lock offered no
attractions to him; "he wa'n't no burglar," he would have scornfully
asserted. A strange horse and wagon hitched by the roadside was the
most flagrant of his thefts; but it was the small things--the hatchet
or axe on the chopping-block, the tin pans sunning at the side door, a
stray garment bleaching on the grass, a hoe, rake, shovel, or a bag of
early potatoes--that tempted him most sorely; and these appealed to him
not so much for their intrinsic value as because they were so
excellently adapted to "swapping." The swapping was really the
enjoyable part of the procedure, the theft was only a sad but necessary
preliminary; for if Abner himself had been a man of sufficient property
to carry on his business operations independently, it is doubtful if he
would have helped himself so freely to his neighbor's goods.

Riverboro regretted the loss of Mrs. Simpson, who was useful in
scrubbing, cleaning, and washing, and was thought to exercise some
influence over her predatory spouse. There was a story of their early
life together, when they had a farm; a story to the effect that Mrs.
Simpson always rode on every load of hay that her husband took to
Milltown, with the view of keeping him sober through the day. After he
turned out of the country road and approached the metropolis, it was
said that he used to bury the docile lady in the load. He would then
drive on to the scales, have the weight of hay entered in the buyer's
book, take his horses to the stable for feed and water, and when a
favorable opportunity offered he would assist the hot and panting Mrs.
Simpson out of the side or back of the rack, and gallantly brush the
straw from her person.  For this reason it was always asserted that
Abner Simpson sold his wife every time he went to Milltown, but the
story was never fully substantiated, and at all events it was the only
suspected blot on meek Mrs. Simpson's personal reputation.

As for the Simpson children, they were missed chiefly as familiar
figures by the roadside; but Rebecca honestly loved Clara Belle,
notwithstanding her Aunt Miranda's opposition to the intimacy.
Rebecca's curious taste in friends was a source of continual anxiety to
her aunt.

"Anything that's human flesh is good enough for her!" Miranda groaned
to Jane. "She'll ride with the rag-sack-and-bottle peddler just as
quick as she would with the minister; she always sets beside the
barefooted young ones at Sabbath school; and she's forever riggin' and
onriggin' that dirty Simpson baby! She reminds me of a puppy that'll
always go to everybody that'll have him!"

It was thought very creditable to Mrs. Fogg that she sent for Clara
Belle to live with her and go to school part of the year. "She'll be
useful," said Mrs. Fogg, "and she'll be out of her father's way, and so
keep honest; though she's so awful homely I've no fears for her. A girl
with her red hair, freckles, and cross-eyes can't fall into no kind of
sin, I don't believe."

Mrs. Fogg requested that Clara Belle should be started on her journey
from Acreville by train and come the rest of the way by stage, and she
was disturbed to receive word on Sunday that Mr. Simpson had borrowed a
horse from a new acquaintance, and would himself drive the girl from
Acreville to Riverboro, a distance of thirty-five miles. That he would
arrive in their vicinity on the very night before the flag-raising was
thought by Riverboro to be a public misfortune, and several residents
hastily determined to deny themselves a sight of the festivities and
remain watchfully on their own premises.

On Monday afternoon the children were rehearsing their songs at the
meeting-house. As Rebecca came out on the broad wooden steps she
watched Mrs. Peter Meserve's buggy out of sight, for in front, wrapped
in a cotton sheet, lay the precious flag. After a few chattering
good-byes and weather prophecies with the other girls, she started on
her homeward walk, dropping in at the parsonage to read her verses to
the minister.

He welcomed her gladly as she removed her white cotton gloves (hastily
slipped on outside the door, for ceremony) and pushed back the funny
hat with the yellow and black porcupine quills--the hat with which she
made her first appearance in Riverboro society.

"You've heard the beginning, Mr. Baxter; now will you please tell me if
you like the last verse?" she asked, taking out her paper. "I've only
read it to Alice Robinson, and I think perhaps she can never be a poet,
though she's a splendid writer. Last year when she was twelve she wrote
a birthday poem to herself, and she made 'natal' rhyme with 'Milton,'
which, of course, it wouldn't. I remember every verse ended:--

  'This is my day so natal
  And I will follow Milton.'

Another one of hers was written just because she couldn't help it she
said.  This was it:--

  'Let me to the hills away,
  Give me pen and paper;
  I'll write until the earth will sway
  The story of my Maker.'"

The minister could scarcely refrain from smiling, but he controlled
himself that he might lose none of Rebecca's quaint observations. When
she was perfectly at ease, unwatched and uncriticised, she was a
marvelous companion.

"The name of the poem is going to be 'My Star,'" she continued, "and
Mrs. Baxter gave me all the ideas, but somehow there's a kind of
magicness when they get into poetry, don't you think so?" (Rebecca
always talked to grown people as if she were their age, or, a more
subtle and truer distinction, as if they were hers.)

"It has often been so remarked, in different words," agreed the
minister.

"Mrs. Baxter said that each star was a state, and if each state did its
best we should have a splendid country. Then once she said that we
ought to be glad the war is over and the States are all at peace
together; and I thought Columbia must be glad, too, for Miss Dearborn
says she's the mother of all the States. So I'm going to have it end
like this: I did n't write it, I just sewed it while I was working on
my star:--

  "For it's your star, my star, all the stars together,
  That make our country's flag so proud
  To float in the bright fall weather.
  Northern stars, Southern stars, stars of the East and West,
  Side by side they lie at peace
  On the dear flag's mother-breast."

"'Oh! many are the poets that are sown by Nature,'" thought the
minister, quoting Wordsworth to himself. "And I wonder what becomes of
them! That's a pretty idea, little Rebecca, and I don't know whether
you or my wife ought to have the more praise. What made you think of
the stars lying on the flag's 'mother-breast'? Were did you get that
word?"

"Why" (and the young poet looked rather puzzled), "that's the way it
is; the flag is the whole country--the mother--and the stars are the
states. The stars had to lie somewhere: 'lap' nor 'arms' wouldn't sound
well with 'West,' so, of course, I said 'breast,'" Rebecca answered,
with some surprise at the question; and the minister put his hand under
her chin and kissed her softly on the forehead when he said good-by at
the door.

Rebecca walked rapidly along in the gathering twilight, thinking of the
eventful morrow.

As she approached the turning on the left, called the old Milltown
road, she saw a white horse and wagon, driven by a man with a rakish,
flapping, Panama hat, come rapidly around the turn and disappear over
the long hills leading down to the falls. There was no mistaking him;
there never was another Abner Simpson, with his lean height, his bushy
reddish hair, the gay cock of his hat, and the long, piratical,
upturned mustaches, which the boys used to say were used as hat-racks
by the Simpson children at night. The old Milltown road ran past Mrs.
Fogg's house, so he must have left Clara Belle there, and Rebecca's
heart glowed to think that her poor little friend need not miss the
raising.

She began to run now, fearful of being late for supper, and covered the
ground to the falls in a brief time. As she crossed the bridge she
again saw Abner Simpson's team, drawn up at the watering-trough.

Coming a little nearer with the view of inquiring for the family, her
quick eye caught sight of something unexpected. A gust of wind blew up
a corner of a linen lap-robe in the back of the wagon, and underneath
it she distinctly saw the white-sheeted bundle that held the flag; the
bundle with a tiny, tiny spot of red bunting peeping out at one corner.
It is true she had eaten, slept, dreamed red, white, and blue for
weeks, but there was no mistaking the evidence of her senses; the
idolized flag, longed for, worked for, sewed for, that flag was in the
back of Abner Simpson's wagon, and if so, what would become of the
raising?

Acting on blind impulse, she ran toward the watering-trough, calling
out in her clear treble "Mr. Simpson! Oh, Mr. Simpson, will you let me
ride a little way with you and hear all about Clara Belle? I'm going
over to the Centre on an errand." (So she was; a most important
errand,--to recover the flag of her country at present in the hands of
the foe!)

Mr. Simpson turned round in his seat and cried heartily, "Certain sure
I will!" for he liked the fair sex, young and old, and Rebecca had
always been a prime favorite with him. "Climb right in! How's
everybody? Glad to see you! The folks talk 'bout you from sun-up to
sun-down, and Clara Belle can't hardly wait for a sight of you!"

Rebecca scrambled up, trembling and pale with excitement. She did not
in the least know what was going to happen, but she was sure that the
flag, when in the enemy's country, must be at least a little safer with
the State of Maine sitting on top of it! Mr. Simpson began a long
monologue about Acreville, the house he lived in, the pond in front of
it, Mrs. Simpson's health and various items of news about the children,
varied by reports of his personal misfortunes. He put no questions, and
asked no replies, so this gave the inexperienced soldier a few seconds
to plan a campaign. There were three houses to pass; the Browns' at the
corner, the Millikens', and the Robinsons' on the brow of the hill. If
Mr. Robinson were in the front yard she might tell Mr. Simpson she
wanted to call there and ask Mr. Robinson to hold the horse's head
while she got out of the wagon. Then she might fly to the back before
Mr. Simpson could realize the situation, and dragging out the precious
bundle, sit on it hard, while Mr. Robinson settled the matter of
ownership with Mr. Simpson.

This was feasible, but it meant a quarrel between the two men, who held
an ancient grudge against each other, and Mr. Simpson was a valiant
fighter, as the various sheriffs who had attempted to arrest him could
cordially testify. It also meant that everybody in the village would
hear of the incident and poor Clara Belle be branded again as the child
of a thief.

Another idea danced into her excited brain; such a clever one she could
hardly believe it hers. She might call Mr. Robinson to the wagon, and
when he came close to the wheels she might say, suddenly: "Please take
the flag out of the back of the wagon, Mr. Robinson. We have brought it
here for you to keep overnight." Then Mr. Simpson might be so surprised
that he would give up his prize rather than be suspected of stealing.

But as they neared the Robinsons' house there was not a sign of life to
be seen; so the last plan, ingenious though it was, was perforce
abandoned.

The road now lay between thick pine woods with no dwelling in sight. It
was growing dusk and Rebecca was driving along the lonely way with a
person who was generally called Slippery Simpson.

Not a thought of fear crossed her mind, save the fear of bungling in
her diplomacy, and so losing the flag. She knew Mr. Simpson well, and a
pleasanter man was seldom to be met. She recalled an afternoon when he
came home and surprised the whole school playing the Revolutionary War
in his helter-skelter dooryard, and the way in which he had joined the
British forces and impersonated General Burgoyne had greatly endeared
him to her. The only difficulty was to find proper words for her
delicate mission, for, of course, if Mr. Simpson's anger were aroused,
he would politely push her out of the wagon and drive away with the
flag. Perhaps if she led the conversation in the right direction an
opportunity would present itself. Clearing her throat nervously, she
began:--

"Is it likely to be fair to-morrow?"

"Guess so; clear as a bell. What's on foot; a picnic?"

"No; we're to have a grand flag-raising!" ("That is," she thought, "if
we have any flag to raise!")

"That so?  Where?"

"The three villages are to club together and have a rally, and raise
the flag at the Centre. There'll be a brass band, and speakers, and the
Mayor of Portland, and the man that will be governor if he's elected,
and a dinner in the Grange Hall, and we girls are chosen to raise the
flag."

"I want to know! That'll be grand, won't it?" (Still not a sign of
consciousness on the part of Abner.)

"I hope Mrs. Fogg will take Clara Belle, for it will be splendid to
look at! Mr. Cobb is going to be Uncle Sam and drive us on the stage.
Miss Dearborn--Clara Belle's old teacher, you know is going to be
Columbia; the girls will be the States of the Union, and oh, Mr.
Simpson, I am the one to be the State of Maine!" Mr. Simpson flourished
the whipstock and gave a loud, hearty laugh. Then he turned in his seat
and regarded Rebecca curiously.

"You're kind o' small, ain't ye, for so big a state as this one?" he
asked.

"Any of us would be too small," replied Rebecca with dignity, "but the
committee asked me, and I am going to try hard to do well."

The tragic thought that there might be no occasion for anybody to do
anything, well or ill, suddenly overcame her here, and putting her hand
on Mr. Simpson's sleeve, she attacked the subject practically and
courageously.

"Oh, Mr. Simpson, dear Mr. Simpson, it's such a mortifying subject I
can't bear to say anything about it, but please give us back our flag!
Don't, don't take it over to Acreville, Mr. Simpson! We've worked so
long to make it, and it was so hard getting the money for the bunting!
Wait a minute, please; don't be angry, and don't say no just yet, till
I explain more. It'll be so dreadful for everybody to get there
to-morrow morning and find no flag to raise, and the band and the mayor
all disappointed, and the children crying, with their muslin dresses
all bought for nothing! Oh, dear Mr. Simpson, please don't take our
flag away from us!"

The apparently astonished Abner pulled his mustaches and exclaimed:
"But I don't know what you're drivin' at! Who's got yer flag? I hain't!"

Could duplicity, deceit, and infamy go any further, Rebecca wondered,
and her soul filling with righteous wrath, she cast discretion to the
winds and spoke a little more plainly, bending her great swimming eyes
on the now embarrassed Abner, who looked like an angle-worm wriggling
on a pin.

"Mr. Simpson, how can you say that, when I saw the flag in the back of
your wagon myself, when you stopped to water the horse? It's wicked of
you to take it, and I cannot bear it!" Her voice broke now, for a doubt
of Mr. Simpson's yielding suddenly darkened her mind. "If you keep it,
you'll have to keep me, for I won't be parted from it! I can't fight
like the boys, but I can pinch and scratch, and I will scratch, just
like a panther--I'll lie right down on my star and not move, if I
starve to death!" "Look here, hold your hosses 'n' don't cry till you
git something to cry for!" grumbled the outraged Abner, to whom a clue
had just come; and leaning over the wagon-back he caught hold of a
corner of white sheet and dragged up the bundle, scooping off Rebecca's
hat in the process, and almost burying her in bunting.

She caught the treasure passionately to her heart and stifled her sobs
in it, while Abner exclaimed "I declare to man, if that hain't a flag!
Well, in that case you're good 'n' welcome to it! Land! I seen that
bundle lyin' in the middle o' the road and I says to myself, that's
somebody's washin' and I'd better pick it up and leave it at the
post-office to be claimed; 'n' all the time it was a flag!"

This was a Simpsonian version of the matter, the fact being that a
white-covered bundle lying on the Meserves' front steps had attracted
his practiced eye, and slipping in at the open gate he had swiftly and
deftly removed it to his wagon on general principles; thinking if it
were clean clothes it would be extremely useful, and in any event there
was no good in passing by something flung into one's very arms, so to
speak. He had had no leisure to examine the bundle, and indeed took
little interest in it. Probably he stole it simply from force of habit,
and because there was nothing else in sight to steal, everybody's
premises being preternaturally tidy and empty, almost as if his visit
had been expected! Rebecca was a practical child, and it seemed to her
almost impossible that so heavy a bundle should fall out of Mrs.
Meserve's buggy and not be noticed; but she hoped that Mr. Simpson was
telling the truth, and she was too glad and grateful to doubt any one
at the moment.

"Thank you, thank you ever so much, Mr. Simpson. You're the nicest,
kindest, politest man I ever knew, and the girls will be so pleased you
gave us back the flag, and so will the Dorcas Society; they'll be sure
to write you a letter of thanks; they always do."

"Tell 'em not to bother 'bout any thanks," said Simpson, beaming
virtuously. "But land! I'm glad 't was me that happened to see that
bundle in the road and take the trouble to pick it up."

("Jest to think of it's bein' a flag!" he thought; "if ever there was a
pesky, wuthless thing to trade off, 't would be a great, gormin' flag
like that!")

"Can I get out now, please?" asked Rebecca. "I want to go back, for
Mrs. Meserve will be dreadfully nervous when she finds out she dropped
the flag, and it hurts her health to be nervous."

"No, you don't," objected Mr. Simpson gallantly, turning the horse. "Do
you think I'd let a little creeter like you lug that great heavy
bundle? I hain't got time to go back to Meserve's, but I'll take you to
the corner and dump you there, flag'n' all, and you can get some o' the
men-folks to carry it the rest o' the way. You'll wear it out, huggin'
it so!"

"I helped make it and I adore it!" said Rebecca, who was in a
grandiloquent mood. "Why don't you like it? It's your country's flag."

Simpson smiled an indulgent smile and looked a trifle bored at these
appeals to his extremely rusty better feelings. "I don' know's I've got
any particular int'rest in the country," he remarked languidly. "I know
I don't owe nothin' to it, nor own nothin' in it!"

"You own a star on the flag, same as everybody," argued Rebecca, who
had been feeding on patriotism for a month; "and you own a state, too,
like all the rest of us!"

"Land! I wish't I did! or even a quarter section of one!" sighed Mr.
Simpson, feeling somehow a little more poverty-stricken and discouraged
than usual.

As they approached the corner and the watering-trough where four
cross-roads met, the whole neighborhood seemed to be in evidence, and
Mr. Simpson suddenly regretted his chivalrous escort of Rebecca;
especially when, as he neared the group, an excited lady, wringing her
hands, turned out to be Mrs. Peter Meserve, accompanied by Huldah, the
Browns, Mrs. Milliken, Abijah Flagg, and Miss Dearborn. "Do you know
anything about the new flag, Rebecca?" shrieked Mrs. Meserve, too
agitated, for a moment, to notice the child's companion.

"It's right here in my lap, all safe," responded Rebecca joyously.

"You careless, meddlesome young one, to take it off my steps where I
left it just long enough to go round to the back and hunt up my
door-key! You've given me a fit of sickness with my weak heart, and
what business was it of yours? I believe you think you own the flag!
Hand it over to me this minute!"

Rebecca was climbing down during this torrent of language, but as she
turned she flashed one look of knowledge at the false Simpson, a look
that went through him from head to foot, as if it were carried by
electricity.

He saw that he had not deceived her after all, owing to the angry
chatter of Mrs. Meserve. He had been handcuffed twice in his life, but
no sheriff had ever discomfited him so thoroughly as this child. Fury
mounted to his brain, and as soon as she was safely out from between
the wheels he stood up in the wagon and flung the flag out in the road
in the midst of the excited group.

"Take it, you pious, stingy, scandal-talkin', flag-raisin' crew!" he
roared. "Rebecca never took the flag; I found it in the road, I say!"

"You never, no such a thing!" exclaimed Mrs. Meserve. "You found it on
the doorsteps in my garden!"

"Mebbe 't was your garden, but it was so chock full o' weeds I thought
't was the road," retorted Abner. "I vow I wouldn't 'a' given the old
rag back to one o' you, not if you begged me on your knees! But
Rebecca's a friend o' my folks and can do with her flag's she's a mind
to, and the rest o' ye can do what ye like an' go where ye like, for
all I care!"

So saying, he made a sharp turn, gave the gaunt white horse a lash and
disappeared in a cloud of dust, before the astonished Mr. Brown, the
only man in the party, had a thought of detaining him.

"I'm sorry I spoke so quick, Rebecca," said Mrs. Meserve, greatly
mortified at the situation. "But don't you believe a word that lyin'
critter said! He did steal it off my doorstep, and how did you come to
be ridin' and consortin' with him? I believe it would kill your Aunt
Miranda if she should hear about it!"

The little school-teacher put a sheltering arm round Rebecca as Mr.
Brown picked up the flag and dusted and folded it.

"I'm willing she should hear about it," Rebecca answered. "I didn't do
anything to be ashamed of! I saw the flag in the back of Mr. Simpson's
wagon and I just followed it. There weren't any men or any Dorcas
ladies to take care of it so it fell to me! You would n't have had me
let it out of my sight, would you, and we going to raise it to-morrow
morning?"

"Rebecca's perfectly right, Mrs. Meserve!" said Miss Dearborn proudly.
"And it's lucky there was somebody quick-witted enough to 'ride and
consort' with Mr. Simpson! I don't know what the village will think,
but seems to me the town clerk might write down in his book, 'This day
the State of Maine saved the flag!'"



V.

THE STATE O' MAINE GIRL

THE foregoing episode, if narrated in a romance, would undoubtedly have
been called "The Saving of the Colors," but at the nightly chats in
Watson's store it was alluded to as the way little Becky Randall got
the flag away from Slippery Simpson. Dramatic as it was, it passed into
the crowd of half-forgotten things in Rebecca's mind, its brief
importance submerged in the glories of the next day.

There was a painful prelude to these glories. Alice Robinson came to
spend the night with Rebecca, and when the bedroom door closed upon the
two girls, Alice announced her intention of "doing up" Rebecca's front
hair in leads and rags, and braiding the back in six tight, wetted
braids.

Rebecca demurred. Alice persisted.

"Your hair is so long and thick and dark and straight," she said, "that
you'll look like an Injun!"

"I am the State of Maine; it all belonged to the Indians once," Rebecca
remarked gloomily, for she was curiously shy about discussing her
personal appearance.

"And your wreath of little pine-cones won't set decent without crimps,"
continued Alice.

Rebecca glanced in the cracked looking-glass and met what she
considered an accusing lack of beauty, a sight that always either
saddened or enraged her according to circumstances; then she sat down
resignedly and began to help Alice in the philanthropic work of making
the State of Maine fit to be seen at the raising.

Neither of the girls was an expert hairdresser, and at the end of an
hour, when the sixth braid was tied, and Rebecca had given one last
shuddering look in the mirror, both were ready to weep with fatigue.

The candle was blown out and Alice soon went to sleep, but Rebecca
tossed on her pillow, its goose-feathered softness all dented by the
cruel lead knobs and the knots of twisted rags. She slipped out of bed
and walked to and fro, holding her aching head with both hands. Finally
she leaned on the window-sill, watching the still weather-vane on
Alice's barn and breathing in the fragrance of the ripening apples,
until her restlessness subsided under the clear starry beauty of the
night.

At six in the morning the girls were out of bed, for Alice could hardly
wait until Rebecca's hair was taken down, she was so eager to see the
result of her labors.

The leads and rags were painfully removed, together with much hair, the
operation being punctuated by a series of squeaks, squeals, and shrieks
on the part of Rebecca and a series of warnings from Alice, who wished
the preliminaries to be kept secret from the aunts, that they might the
more fully appreciate the radiant result.

Then came the unbraiding, and then--dramatic moment--the "combing out;"
a difficult, not to say impossible process, in which the hairs that had
resisted the earlier stages almost gave up the ghost.

The long front strands had been wound up from various angles and by
various methods, so that, when released, they assumed the strangest,
most obstinate, most unexpected attitudes. When the comb was dragged
through the last braid, the wild, tortured, electric hairs following,
and then rebounding from it in a bristling, snarling tangle,
Massachusetts gave one encompassing glance at the State o' Maine's
head, and announced her intention of going home to breakfast! Alice was
deeply grieved at the result of her attempted beautifying, but she felt
that meeting Miss Miranda Sawyer at the morning meal would not mend
matters in the least, so slipping out of the side door, she ran up
Guide-Board hill as fast as her feet could carry her.

The State o' Maine, deserted and somewhat unnerved, sat down before the
glass and attacked her hair doggedly and with set lips, working over it
until Miss Jane called her to breakfast; then, with a boldness born of
despair, she entered the dining-room, where her aunts were already
seated at table. There was a moment of silence after the grotesque
figure was fully taken in; then came a moan from Jane and a groan from
Miranda.

"What have you done to yourself?" asked Miranda sternly.

"Made an effort to be beautiful and failed!" jauntily replied Rebecca,
but she was too miserable to keep up the fiction. "Oh, Aunt Miranda,
don't scold, I'm so unhappy! Alice and I rolled up my hair to curl it
for the raising. She said it was so straight I looked like an Indian!"

"Mebbe you did," vigorously agreed Miranda, "but 't any rate you looked
like a Christian Injun, 'n' now you look like a heathen Injun; that's
all the difference I can see. What can we do with her, Jane, between
this and nine o'clock?"

"We'll all go out to the pump just as soon as we're through breakfast,"
answered Jane soothingly. "We can accomplish considerable with water
and force."

Rebecca nibbled her corn-cake, her tearful eyes cast on her plate and
her chin quivering.

"Don't you cry and red your eyes up," chided Miranda quite kindly; "the
minute you've eaten enough run up and get your brush and meet us at the
back door."

"I would n't care myself how bad I looked," said Rebecca, "but I can't
bear to be so homely that I shame the State of Maine!"

Oh, what an hour followed this plaint! Did any aspirant for literary or
dramatic honors ever pass to fame through such an antechamber of
horrors? Did poet of the day ever have his head so maltreated?  To be
dipped in the rain-water tub, soused again and again; to be held under
the spout and pumped on; to be rubbed furiously with rough roller
towels; to be dried with hot flannels!  And is it not well-nigh
incredible that at the close of such an hour the ends of the long hair
should still stand out straight, the braids having been turned up two
inches by Alice, and tied hard in that position with linen thread?

"Get out the skirt-board, Jane," cried Miranda, to whom opposition
served as a tonic, "and move that flat-iron on to the front o' the
stove. Rebecca, set down in that low chair beside the board, and, Jane,
you spread out her hair on it and cover it up with brown paper. Don't
cringe, Rebecca; the worst's over, and you've borne up real good! I'll
be careful not to pull your hair nor scorch you, and oh, how I'd like
to have Alice Robinson acrost my knee and a good slipper in my right
hand! There, you're all ironed out and your Aunt Jane can put on your
white dress and braid your hair up again good and tight. Perhaps you
won't be the homeliest of the States, after all; but when I see you
comin' in to breakfast I said to myself: 'I guess if Maine looked like
that, it would n't never 'a' been admitted into the Union!'"

When Uncle Sam and the stagecoach drew up to the brick house with a
grand swing and a flourish, the Goddess of Liberty and most of the
States were already in their places on the "harricane deck." Words fail
to describe the gallant bearing of the horses, their headstalls gayly
trimmed and their harnesses dotted with little flags. The stage windows
were hung in bunting, and from within beamed Columbia, looking out from
the bright frame as if proud of her freight of loyal children.
Patriotic streamers floated from whip, from dash-board and from rumble,
and the effect of the whole was something to stimulate the most
phlegmatic voter. Rebecca came out on the steps and Aunt Jane brought a
chair to assist in the ascent.  Miss Dearborn peeped from the window,
and gave a despairing look at her favorite.

What had happened to her? Who had dressed her? Had her head been put
through a wringing-machine? Why were her eyes red and swollen?  Miss
Dearborn determined to take her behind the trees in the pine grove and
give her some finishing touches; touches that her skillful fingers
fairly itched to bestow.

The stage started, and as the roadside pageant grew gayer and gayer,
Rebecca began to brighten and look prettier, for most of her
beautifying came from within. The people, walking, driving, or standing
on their doorsteps, cheered Uncle Sam's coach with its freight of
gossamer-muslined, fluttering-ribboned girls, and just behind, the
gorgeously decorated haycart, driven by Abijah Flagg, bearing the jolly
but inharmonious fife and drum corps. Was ever such a golden day; such
crystal air; such mellow sunshine; such a merry Uncle Sam!

The stage drew up at an appointed spot near a pine grove, and while the
crowd was gathering, the children waited for the hour to arrive when
they should march to the platform; the hour toward which they seemed to
have been moving since the dawn of creation. As soon as possible Miss
Dearborn whispered to Rebecca: "Come behind the trees with me; I want
to make you prettier!"

Rebecca thought she had suffered enough from that process already
during the last twelve hours, but she put out an obedient hand and the
two withdrew.

Now Miss Dearborn was, I fear, a very indifferent teacher. Her stock in
trade was small, her principal virtues being devotion to children and
ability to gain their love, and a power of evolving a schoolroom order
so natural, cheery, serene, and peaceful that it gave the beholder a
certain sense of being in a district heaven.  She was poor in
arithmetic and weak in geometry, but if you gave her a rose, a bit of
ribbon, and a seven-by-nine looking-glass she could make herself as
pretty as a pink in two minutes.

Safely sheltered behind the pines, Miss Dearborn began to practice
mysterious feminine arts.  She flew at Rebecca's tight braids, opened
the strands and rebraided them loosely; bit and tore the red, white,
and blue ribbon in two and tied the braids separately.  Then with
nimble fingers she pulled out little tendrils of hair behind the ears
and around the nape of the neck. After a glance of acute disapproval
directed at the stiff balloon skirt she knelt on the ground and gave a
strenuous embrace to Rebecca's knees, murmuring, between her hugs,
"Starch must be cheap at the brick house!"

This particular line of beauty attained, there ensued great pinchings
of ruffles; the fingers that could never hold a ferule nor snap
children's ears being incomparable fluting-irons. Next the sash was
scornfully untied, and tightened to suggest something resembling a
waist.  The chastened bows that had been squat, dowdy, spiritless, were
given tweaks, flirts, bracing little pokes and dabs, till,
acknowledging a master hand, they stood up, piquant, pert, smart, alert!

Pride of bearing was now infused into the flattened lace at the neck,
and a pin (removed at some sacrifice from her own toilette) was darned
in at the back to prevent any cowardly lapsing. The short white cotton
gloves that called attention to the tanned wrists and arms were
stripped off and put in her own pocket. Then the wreath of pine-cones
was adjusted at a heretofore unimagined angle, the hair was pulled
softly into a fluffy frame, and finally, as she met Rebecca's grateful
eyes, she gave her two approving, triumphant kisses. In a second the
sensitive face lighted into happiness; pleased dimples appeared in the
cheeks, the kissed mouth was as red as a rose, and the little fright
that had walked behind the pine-tree stepped out on the other side
Rebecca, the lovely.

As to the relative value of Miss Dearborn's accomplishments, the
decision must be left to the gentle reader; but though it is certain
that children should be properly grounded in mathematics, no heart of
flesh could bear to hear Miss Dearborn's methods vilified who had seen
her patting, pulling, squeezing Rebecca from ugliness into beauty.

Now all was ready; the moment of fate was absolutely at hand; the fife
and drum corps led the way and the States followed; but what actually
happened Rebecca never knew; she lived through the hours in a waking
dream. Every little detail was a facet of light that reflected
sparkles, and among them all she was fairly dazzled. The brass band
played inspiring strains; the mayor spoke eloquently on great themes;
the people cheered; then the rope on which so much depended was put
into the children's hands, they applied superhuman strength to their
task, and the flag mounted, mounted, smoothly and slowly, and slowly
unwound and stretched itself until its splendid size and beauty were
revealed against the maples and pines and blue New England sky.

Then after cheers upon cheers and after a patriotic chorus by the
church choirs, the State of Maine mounted the platform, vaguely
conscious that she was to recite a poem, though for the life of her she
could not remember a single word.

"Speak up loud and clear, Rebecky," whispered Uncle Sam in the front
row, but she could scarcely hear her own voice when, tremblingly, she
began her first line.  After that she gathered strength, and the poem
"said itself," while the dream went on. She saw her friend Adam Ladd
leaning against a tree; Aunt Jane and Aunt Miranda palpitating with
nervousness; Clara Belle Simpson gazing cross-eyed but adoring from a
seat on the side; and in the far, far distance, on the very outskirts
of the crowd, a tall man standing in a wagon--a tall, loose-jointed man
with red upturned mustaches, and a gaunt white horse whose head was
turned toward the Acreville road.

Loud applause greeted the State of Maine, the slender little white-clad
figure standing on the mossy boulder that had been used as the centre
of the platform. The sun came up from behind a great maple and shone
full on the star-spangled banner, making it more dazzling than ever, so
that its beauty drew all eyes upward.

Abner Simpson lifted his vagrant shifting gaze to its softly fluttering
folds and its splendid massing of colors, thinking:--

"I don't know's anybody'd ought to steal a flag, the thunderin' idjuts
seem to set such store by it, and what is it, anyway? Nothin' but a
sheet o' buntin'!'"

Nothing but a sheet of bunting? He looked curiously at the rapt faces
of the mothers, their babies asleep in their arms; the parted lips and
shining eyes of the white-clad girls; at Cap'n Lord, who had been in
Libby Prison, and Nat Strout, who had left an arm at Bull Run; at the
friendly, jostling crowd of farmers, happy, eager, absorbed, their
throats ready to burst with cheers. Then the breeze served, and he
heard Rebecca's clear voice saying:--

  "For it's your star, my star, all the stars together,
  That make our country's flag so proud
  To float in the bright fall weather!"

"Talk about stars! She's got a couple of 'em right in her head,"
thought Simpson. "If I ever seen a young one like that layin' on
anybody's doorstep I'd hook her quicker'n a wink, though I've got
plenty to home, the Lord knows! And I wouldn't swap her off
neither.--Spunky little creeter, too; settin' up in the wagon lookin'
'bout's big as a pint o' cider, but keepin' right after the flag!--I
vow I'm 'bout sick o' my job! Never with the crowd, allers jest on the
outside, 's if I wa'n't as good's they be! If it paid well, mebbe would
n't mind, but they're so thunderin' stingy round here, they don't leave
out anything decent for you to take from 'em, yet you're reskin' your
liberty 'n' reputation jest the same!--Countin' the poor pickin's 'n'
the time I lose in jail I might most's well be done with it 'n' work
out by the day, as the folks want me to; I'd make 'bout's much, n' I
don' know's it would be any harder!"

He could see Rebecca stepping down from the platform, while his own
red-headed little girl stood up on her bench, waving her hat with one
hand, her handkerchief with the other, and stamping with both feet.

Now a man sitting beside the mayor rose from his chair and Abner heard
him call:--

"Three cheers for the women who made the flag!"

"Hip, hip, hurrah!"

"Three cheers for the State of Maine!"

"Hip, hip, hurrah!"

"Three cheers for the girl who saved the flag from the hands of the
enemy!"

"Hip, hip, hurrah!"

It was the Edgewood minister, whose full, vibrant voice was of the sort
to move a crowd. His words rang out into the clear air and were carried
from lip to lip. Hands clapped, feet stamped, hats swung, while the
loud huzzahs might almost have wakened the echoes on old Mount Ossipee.

The tall, loose-jointed man sat down in the wagon suddenly and took up
the reins.

"They're gettin' a little mite personal, and I guess it's 'bout time
for you to be goin', Simpson!"

The tone was jocular, but the red mustaches drooped, and the
half-hearted cut he gave to start the white mare on her homeward
journey showed that he was not in his usual reckless mood.

"It's a lie!" he burst out in a vindictive undertone, as the mare swung
into her long gait. "It's a lie! I thought 't was somebody's wash!  I
ain't an enemy!"

While the crowd at the raising dispersed in happy family groups to
their picnics in the woods; while the Goddess of Liberty, Uncle Sam,
Columbia, and the proud States lunched grandly in the Grange Hall with
distinguished guests and scarred veterans of two wars, the lonely man
drove, and drove, and drove through silent woods and dull, sleepy
villages, never alighting to replenish his wardrobe or his stock of
swapping material.

At dusk he reached a miserable tumble-down house on the edge of a pond.

The faithful wife with the sad mouth and the habitual look of anxiety
in her faded eyes came to the door at the sound of wheels and went
doggedly to the horse-shed to help him unharness. "You did n't expect
to see me back to-night, did you?" he asked satirically; "leastwise not
with this same horse? Well, I'm here! You need n't be scairt to look
under the wagon-seat, there ain't nothin' there, not even my supper, so
I hope you're suited for once! No, I guess I ain't goin' to be an angel
right away, neither. There wa'n't nothin' but flags layin' roun' loose
down Riverboro way, 'n' whatever they say, I ain't sech a hound as to
steal a flag!"

It was natural that young Riverboro should have red, white, and blue
dreams on the night after the new flag was raised.  A stranger thing,
perhaps, is the fact that Abner Simpson should lie down on his hard bed
with the flutter of bunting before his eyes, and a whirl of
unaccustomed words in his mind.

"For it is your star, my star, all our stars together."

"I'm sick of goin' it alone," he thought; "I guess I'll try the other
road for a spell;" and with that he fell asleep.









End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Flag-raising, by Kate Douglas Wiggin

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE FLAG-RAISING ***

***** This file should be named 2315.txt or 2315.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/2/3/1/2315/

Produced by Susan L. Farley.  HTML version by Al Haines.

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org


Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.


Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.


Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
